Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-771
Hospital, defined.

Hospital shall mean an institution licensed as a hospital by the Department of Health and Human Services and defined in section 71-419.

Laws 1980, LB 646, § 3;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 236;

Laws 2000, LB 819, § 69;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 173.